Tennessee, session 114, HB0039.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-417, is amended by deleting the
section and substituting instead the following:
(a) This section is known and may be cited as the "Menstrual Hygiene Products
Accessibility Act."
(b) As used in this section:
(1) "Eligible school" means a public school, including a public charter
school, that is a senior high school, as defined in § 49-6-401; and
(2) "Feminine hygiene product":
(A) Means a product or material designed for feminine hygiene in
connection with menstruation or other genital-tract secretions; and
(B) Includes tampons, panty liners, menstrual cups, sanitary
napkins, and other similar personal products or materials.
(c) Each LEA and public charter school shall provide feminine hygiene products,
at no charge, in all women's and girls' bathrooms, in all locker rooms, and with the
school nurse in each eligible school building where instruction is provided, excluding
bathrooms and locker rooms that are specifically designated for teacher or staff use.
The feminine hygiene products provided pursuant to this section are for student use
only.
HB0039
000853
- 1 -

(d) The department of education may develop policies and provide guidance to
LEAs and public charter schools to assist local boards of education and public charter
school governing bodies in complying with the requirements of this section.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 000853